Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Chapter 33 Medical Malpractice Insurance

Cross references. —

As to the Medical Malpractice Insurance Assistance Act, see title 35, chapter 1, article 9.

Severability. —

Section 3, ch. 179, Laws 1977, reads: “If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable.”

Study. —

Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch. 4, § 1, directs the Wyoming health care commission with assistance from the insurance commissioner to study the feasibility, costs and benefits of a new system to address and resolve health care errors and health care malpractice which study is to include: (1) definition and identification of health care errors; (2) identification of general and systemic causes of health care errors; (3) reporting of health care errors to a health care errors commission; (4) prevention of health care errors through systemic improvements that enhance patient safety; (5) a system to compensate individuals, as their exclusive remedy, for damages resulting from health care errors, including payment for all health care expenses arising from the error and other expenses and lost opportunities, including loss of actual and potential earnings, increased living expenses, decreased quality of life and other compensation as appropriate and as provided through a schedule or formula; and (6) prevention and elimination of unfounded allegations and unnecessary actions against health care providers in cases which do not amount to medical malpractice. In addition, the study is to ascertain (1) the probable costs of the system including but not limited to the costs of administration, improvements to the health care system needed to prevent future errors, compensating those persons injured by errors and to health care professionals in providing the financial resources necessary to support the system; (2) the size of the health care errors commission and the appropriate mix of health care professionals, attorneys and public representatives on the commission; (3) the administration and management of the commission including staffing and procedures for handling claims; (4) the schedules or formulas necessary to determine the compensation of people injured by health care errors; (5) the appropriate means for a person aggrieved by an action of the commission to seek judicial review; (6) an analysis of this system's costs and benefits for health care professionals, victims of health care errors and the public compared to the present system of tort; and (7) any other factors the health care commission deems relevant to the general topic. The health care commission is to report its findings under this section and recommendations for legislation to the joint appropriations, joint corporations, elections and political subdivisions, joint judiciary and joint labor, health and social services interim committees, a preliminary draft which is due on or before September 1, 2005 and the final report due on or before October 15, 2005.

Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch. 4, § 10, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved July 29, 2004.

Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch. 4, § 2, directs the Wyoming health care commission with assistance from the insurance commissioner to study issues relating to insurance reform, specifically, (1) self-insurance pools or state-funded insurance programs to provide excess liability insurance for health-care providers; (2) the Nebraska excess liability fund; (3) the practicality of a Nebraska style excess liability fund for Wyoming health care providers; (4) similarities and differences between the Nebraska and Wyoming tort systems, as they would affect the practicality or advisability of a Nebraska style excess liability fund in Wyoming; (5) estimated capitalization and other start-up expenses for an excess liability self-insurance pool or state-funded insurance program; and (6) current efforts related to comprehensive medical malpractice and general individual health insurance regulation reform in other states, chosen at the discretion of the commission including but not limited to efforts to restrict premium rate increases or policy cancellation resulting from claims made by an insured but not paid by the insurer and the effects of renewal dates on availability of insurance; and (7) any other issues deemed appropriate and necessary. The commission is to report its finding under this section and recommendations for legislation to the join appropriations, joint corporations, elections and political subdivisions, joint judiciary and joint labor, health and social services interim committees on or before November 1, 2004.

Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch. 4, § 3, directs the Wyoming health care commission with assistance from the insurance commissioner to study the feasibility of requiring physicians to create one or more risk retention groups or other similar insurance mechanisms for the purpose of providing medical malpractice liability insurance to physicians providing medical care to persons in the state, which study is to include: (1) a determination of the number of physicians who practice in the state; (2) a review of the historical and expected loss experiences of medical malpractice liability insurers, including risk retention groups, that have insured physicians against loss associated with medical malpractice in the state; (3) a review of expected coverages, deductibles, limits, rates and rating classification systems based upon current industry practices in the state and in other states; (4) a review of reserve fund requirements necessary for group solvency; (5) an examination of and recommendations regarding risk retention groups or other similar insurance mechanisms management, underwriting procedures, managerial oversight methods and investment policies; (6) an examination of the probable impact of requiring creation of and membership in one or more risk retention groups or other similar insurance mechanisms upon the current market for medical liability insurance; (7) an evaluation of the feasibility of using other programs in addition to or in correlation with one or more risk retention groups or other similar insurance mechanisms, including the medical liability compensation account; (8) recommendations regarding the manner in which one or more risk retention groups or other similar insurance mechanisms may be created and participation therein by physicians required; and (9) an evaluation of the need for and potential levels of any state subsidy or loan necessary to create a viable insurance mechanism for providing medical malpractice insurance to the state's physicians with a goal of providing one-time loans or subsidies to cause long-term stabilized rates and sound reserves. The commission is to report its findings and recommendations for legislation for consideration by the joint appropriations interim committee on or before November 15, 2004.

Laws 2004, Sp. Sess. ch. 4, § 4, directs the Wyoming health care commission with assistance from the insurance commissioner to design and complete an actuarial study to determine the expected effects on health care provider's medical malpractice claims experience and insurance premiums of establishing limitations on damages recoverable for noneconomic losses suffered as a result of medical malpractice or alleged medical malpractice. Specifically, the study is to determine those effects as the limitation amount is set at various levels. The commission is to report the results of the study to the joint appropriations, joint corporations, elections and political subdivisions, joint judiciary and joint labor, health and social services interim committees on or before October 15, 2004.

Laws 2004, Sp. Sess. ch. 4, § 9(b), appropriates $50,000 or so much thereof as is necessary from the budget reserve account to the insurance department for the purposes of the act.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Arbitration of medical malpractice claims, 84 ALR3d 375.

Duty of medical practitioner to warn patient of subsequently discovered danger from treatment previously given, 12 ALR4th 41.

Liability of hospital, physician, or other individual medical practitioner for injury or death resulting from blood transfusion, 20 ALR4th 136.

Medical malpractice: instrument breaking in course of surgery or treatment, 20 ALR4th 1179.

Coverage and exclusions of liability or indemnity policy on physicians, surgeons, and other healers, 33 ALR4th 14.

Validity of state statute providing for periodic payment of future damages in medical malpractice action, 41 ALR4th 275.

Health provider's agreement as to patient's copayment liability after award by professional service insurer as unfair trade practice under state law, 49 ALR4th 1240.

Propriety and prejudicial effect of trial counsel's reference or suggestion in medical malpractice case that defendant is insured, 71 ALR4th 1025.

Joint and several liability of physicians whose independent negligence in treatment of patient causes indivisible injury, 9 ALR5th 746.

Malpractice in treatment of skin disease, disorder, blemish, or scar, 19 ALR5th 563.

Medical malpractice: negligent catheterization, 31 ALR5th 1.

Medical malpractice liability of sports medicine care providers for injury to, or death of, athlete, 33 ALR5th 619.

Medical malpractice: physician's admission of negligence as establishing standard of care and breach of that standard, 42 ALR5th 1.

Liability for donee's contraction of Acquired Immune Deficiency Syndrome (AIDS) from blood transfusion, 64 ALR5th 333.

§ 26-33-101.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Account” means the medical liability compensation account;

“Board” means the board of directors of the medical liability compensation account;

“Health care” means any act or treatment performed or furnished, or which should have been performed or furnished, by any physician for, to, or on behalf of a patient during the patient’s medical care, treatment or confinement;

“Insurer” means an authority or an insurance company engaged in writing malpractice liability insurance in this state in accordance with this code [title 26];

“Malpractice” means the rendering of or failure to render professional medical services as a result of which the patient has a cause of action against a licensed physician for monetary damages;

“Physician” means a person licensed by the state board of medicine to provide health care or professional services as a physician.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 179, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-691; W.S. 1977, §

26-40-101

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1991, ch. 143, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a)(i), deleted “within the trust and agency fund.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Patient's failure to reveal medical history to physician as contributory negligence or assumption of risk in defense of malpractice action, 33 ALR4th 790.

Medical malpractice: liability for failure of physician to inform patient of alternative modes of diagnosis or treatment, 38 ALR4th 900.

Recovery by patient on whom surgery or other treatment was performed by one other than physician who patient believed would perform it, 39 ALR4th 1034.

Medical malpractice: liability based on misrepresentation of the nature and hazards of treatment, 42 ALR4th 543.

Physician's liability to third person for prescribing drug to known drug addict, 42 ALR4th 586.

Res ipsa loquitur in negligent anesthesia cases, 49 ALR4th 63.

§ 26-33-102.
Qualification.

To be qualified under this chapter, a physician shall annually purchase health care professional liability insurance coverage of not less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) per occurrence for any act, error or omission relating to medical care rendered during the policy year and pay the surcharge pursuant to W.S. 26-33-105(c).

A physician failing to qualify under this section is not covered by this chapter.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 179, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 26.1-692, 26.1-693; W.S. 1977, §§

26-40-102

,

26-40-103

, Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Temporary provisions. —

Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 1, directs that for the period beginning July 1, 2004, and ending June 30, 2006, services authorized under Wyoming Medical Assistance and Services Act involving the delivery of a child, including prenatal and postpartum care related to the delivery, are to be reimbursed at 90% of the statewide average of the physician's specialty for the services provided as of July 1, 2004, not to exceed 100% of the provider's usual and customary billed charges.

Laws 2004, ch. 101, § 1, as amended by Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 3, provides:

“(a) through (c)

Repealed by Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 3.

“(d)

If a community is without obstetric services and the physicians who had previously provided obstetric services have purchased the insurance coverage known as tail coverage to provide coverage for incidents occurring but not discovered while they were providing obstetric services, the health department may contract to purchase any such additional coverage that may be required at the end of this program if the physicians will return to provide obstetric services for recipients eligible for services under the Wyoming Medical Assistance and Services Act for the duration of this program.

“(e)

The Wyoming legislature finds that the payment authorized by this act is necessary to assure the continued availability of obstetric services for recipients eligible for services under the Wyoming Medical Assistance and Services Act and thus constitutes a necessary support of the poor as permitted by Article 16, Section 6 of the Wyoming Constitution.”

For the provisions of section 1 (a) through (c), see the Wyoming Statutes Annotated 2004 Supplement, §

26-33-102

.

Laws 2004, ch. 101, § 2, as amended by Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 2, appropriates $200,000 from the general fund to the department of health for the purposes of this act for the purchase of tail coverage, which is to remain available for expenditure until June 30, 2006.

Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 4, directs the department of health to report the additional costs incurred by the increased reimbursement rate under the act and recommendations for modifications to the reimbursement rate for obstetric services under the Medical Assistance and Services Act to the joint appropriations interim committee on or before October 31, 2005.

Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 5, directs that the $3,000,000 appropriated to the department of health under Laws 2004, ch. 101, § 2, be deappropriated and deposited in the general fund. Section 5 further directs that for the purposes of Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., Act 2, $2,050,000 is to be appropriated from the general fund and $2,600,00 from federal funds to the department of health for the period July 1, 2004 through June 30, 2006.

Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 6, makes this section effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved July 17, 2004.

§ 26-33-103.
Insurance coverage.

A qualified physician shall be insured in a minimum amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) against a claim for malpractice. Any award or settlement adjudicated or allowed on a malpractice claim in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) or limits of other underlying coverage if greater occurring during any year in which the physician is qualified under this chapter shall be paid from the account subject to the limitation that obligations from the account shall not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000.00) in any calendar year for one (1) or more awards or settlements against an individual physician.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 179, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-694; W.S. 1977, §

26-40-104

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-33-104.
Advance payments.

Any advance payment a defendant physician or his insurer makes to or for the plaintiff, or any other person, is not an admission of liability for injuries or damages the plaintiff or anyone else suffers as to a claim for malpractice. Evidence of an advance payment is not admissible in a court proceeding concerning malpractice until there is final determination in the plaintiff’s favor, in which case the final amount payable shall be reduced by any advance payments.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 179, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-695; W.S. 1977, § 26-40-105; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-33-105.
Medical liability compensation account.

There is created a medical liability compensation account, the monies of which shall be collected by the commissioner for exclusive use for the purposes stated in this chapter. The account and any investment income from it shall be held in trust and invested and reinvested by the state treasurer pursuant to W.S. 9-4-715(a), (d) and (e).

The commissioner may use account monies to purchase insurance for the account and its obligations. The commissioner shall be notified of a suit within thirty (30) days from the date the suit is filed. The commissioner may participate in a physician’s defense if any claim is sufficient to be a potential liability against the account. Reasonable legal expenses the board approves and the commissioner incurs in defense against any malpractice claim are payable out of the account.

To create the account, all physicians qualified under W.S.

26-33-102

, practicing in Wyoming and who elect to participate, shall pay an annual surcharge. The commissioner shall determine the surcharge based upon sound actuarial principles using data obtained from Wyoming experience. The surcharge shall not exceed one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the cost to each physician for a basic fifty thousand dollar ($50,000.00) malpractice insurance premium and shall be collected on the same basis as premiums by each insurer from the physician.

The surcharge is due and payable within thirty (30) days after the insurer receives the premiums for malpractice liability insurance from the practicing physician in Wyoming. The commissioner shall send to each insurer a statement explaining the provisions of this section together with any other information necessary for their compliance with this section.

If the insurer collects the annual premium surcharge but does not pay it to the state within the stated time limit, the commissioner may suspend the insurer’s certificate of authority until the annual premium surcharge is paid.

All expenses of collecting, protecting and administering the account or related to the purchase of insurance for the account shall be paid from the account. The commissioner may employ financial, administrative or legal consultants to assist in the account management.

If the account balance exceeds four million dollars ($4,000,000.00) at the end of any calendar year after payment of all claims and expenses, the commissioner shall reduce the surcharge to maintain the account at an approximate level of four million dollars ($4,000,000.00).

The commissioner shall purchase reinsurance, if needed, to protect the account from depletion due to judgment against it. The reinsurance so purchased shall cover each qualified physician from two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000.00) to one million dollars ($1,000,000.00) per year. Cost of reinsurance shall be paid from the monies of the account.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 179, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-696; W.S. 1977, § 26-40-106; Laws 1979, ch. 17, § 2; 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1996, ch. 112, § 2; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2008, ch. 113, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), deleted “within the trust and agency fund” in the first sentence; and in (b), substituted “account” for “fund.”

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “W.S. 9-4-715(a), (d) and (e)” for “W.S.

9-4-711

” in (a).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 26-33-106.
Board created; membership; removal; terms; duties.

There is created a medical liability compensation account board which shall consist of six (6) members. The governor shall appoint four (4) members with the advice and consent of the senate. The state treasurer and the commissioner are the other voting members. The governor may remove any member he appoints as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

Of the members the governor appoints:

One (1) shall be a physician licensed to practice in Wyoming by the state board of medicine;

One (1) shall be a practicing attorney licensed to practice in Wyoming by the Wyoming state bar;

One (1) shall be a health care consumer; and

One (1) shall be a licensed insurance agent in Wyoming.

Two (2) members shall serve for terms ending two (2) years from January 1 immediately following their appointment and two (2) members shall serve for a term of four (4) years from that date. Their successors shall serve for terms of three (3) years each. Effective July 1, 1979, appointments and terms shall be in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

through

28-12-103

.

The board shall administer and govern the account and shall file rules and regulations therefor with the secretary of state.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 179, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-696; W.S. 1977, § 26-40-106; Laws 1979, ch. 17, § 2; 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1991, ch. 143, § 1.

§ 26-33-107.
Settlements.

Any settlement of a claim against a physician exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) or limits of other underlying coverage if greater shall be carried out through agreement jointly by the claimant, the insurance carrier and the commissioner. If the claimant settles with the insurance carrier, without including the commissioner in the settlement agreement, the claimant waives any claim for damages exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) or limits of other underlying coverage if greater arising from the incident for which the claim is made.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 179, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-697; W.S. 1977, § 26-40-107; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-33-108.
Payments from account.

The state auditor, at the direction of the commissioner, shall issue a warrant in satisfaction of each claim submitted to him against the account after receipt of a certified copy of a final judgment from a court having jurisdiction, or a settlement agreement signed by a claimant, a qualified representative of the insurance carrier and the commissioner, with original signatures. The warrant shall be for the amount exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) or limits of other underlying coverage, if greater, set forth in the judgment or settlement, subject to the limitation that the amounts paid from the account shall not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000.00) in any calendar year for one (1) or more awards or settlements against an individual physician.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 179,§ 1; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-698; W.S. 1977, § 26-40-108; Laws 1983, ch. 190,§ 1; 2015 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “state auditor, at the direction of the commissioner” for “state treasurer” in the first sentence.

§ 26-33-109.
Contents of policies.

Any policy issued under this chapter is presumed to comply with this chapter. The insurer assumes all obligations to pay an award imposed against its insured under this chapter and no policy termination by cancellation is effective unless at least ninety (90) days before the effective date of the cancellation both the insured and the commissioner receive at their offices, a written notice giving the date upon which termination is effective.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 179, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-699; W.S. 1977, § 26-40-109; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-33-110.
Failure to pay claims.

If a professional liability insurer, in the regular course of business, fails to pay its portion of any judgment rendered against any physician or any other person insured under this chapter, the commissioner shall suspend that insurer’s certificate of authority until the portion of the judgment allocable to the insurer is paid in full, provided the insurer has the right to a hearing in accordance with W.S. 26-3-115(b).

This section does not apply:

If the insurer has asserted against the physician any policy defense based upon misrepresentation, fraud, noncooperation or any other matter which constitutes an avoidance of the policy;

If the time for filing any petition for review, new trial, appeal or rehearing, or all of them has not expired; or

Until such time as all review or appellate decisions are final.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 179, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-700; W.S. 1977, § 26-40-110; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-33-111.
Exemption from Wyoming Insurance Guaranty Association Act.

This chapter is exempt from and has no application to the Wyoming Insurance Guaranty Association Act [chapter 31 of title 26].

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 179, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-701; W.S. 1977, § 26-40-111; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.